tr: Döndürücü Tipi: 2 tekerlekli; 4 tekerlekli; 8 tekerlekli; Diğer
nb: Spinnertype: 2-hjul; 4-hjul; 8-hjul; Annet
bg-BG: Тип на въртене: 2 колела; 4 колела; 8 колела; Други
th: ประเภทเครื่องปั่น: 2 ล้อ; 4 ล้อ; 8 ล้อ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta koleščkov: 2-kolesni; 4-kolesni; 8-kolesni; Drugo
it: Numero di ruote: 2 ruote; 4 ruote; 8 ruote; Altro
ko: 바퀴 유형: 2륜; 4륜; 8륜; 기타
ro-RO: Tip spinner: 2 roți; 4 roți; 8 roți; Altele
zh-CN: 旋转类型: 2 轮; 4 轮; 8 轮; 其他
pl: Typ tarczy obrotowej: 2-kołowy; 4-kołowy; 8-kołowy; Inne
ja: スピナータイプ: 2輪; 4輪; 8輪; その他
da: Spinner-type: 2-hjulet; 4-hjulet; 8-hjulet; Andet
vi: Loại vòng quay: 2 bánh; 4 bánh; 8 bánh; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta prtljage s kotačima: Dva kotača; Četiri kotača; Osam kotača; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo giratório: 2 rodas; 4 rodas; 8 rodas; Outro
fr: Type de fileur: 2 roues; 4 roues; 8 roues; Autre
sk-SK: Počet koliesok: 2-kolesový; 4-kolesový; 8-kolesový; Iné
es: Tipo de ruedas giratorias: 2 ruedas; 4 ruedas; 8 ruedas; Otros
fi: Pyörintyyppi: 2-pyöräinen; 4-pyöräinen; 8-pyöräinen; Muu
sv: Hjultyp: 2-hjulig; 4-hjulig; 8-hjulig; Övrigt
hu: Gurulós bőrönd típusa: 2 kerekű; 4 kerekű; 8 kerekű; Egyéb
de: Spinner-Typ: 2 Räder; 4 Räder; 8 Räder; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de rodas giratórias: 2 rodas; 4 rodas; 8 rodas; Outro
nl: Spinnertype: 2-wielen; 4-wielen; 8-wielen; Andere
zh-TW: 旋轉器類型: 2 輪; 4 輪; 8 輪; 其他
lt-LT: Suktuko tipas: Dviejų ratų; Keturių ratų; Aštuonių ratų; Kita
ru: Тип спиннера: 2-колесный; 4-колесный; 8-колесный; Другое
cs: Typ kufru spinner: 2 kola; 4 kola; 8 kol; Jiné
en: Spinner type: 2-wheel; 4-wheel; 8-wheel; Other
el: Τύπος περιστρεφόμενου τροχού: 2 τροχών; Τετράτροχο; 8 τροχών; Άλλο